Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2516.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 107 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.805, No.247), known as the Pennsylvania Municipalities Planning Code, 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829 is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 107. Definitions.--(a) The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Agricultural conservation easement," as defined in section 3 of the act of June 30, 1981 (P.L.128, No.43), known as the "Agricultural Area Security Law."* * *"Agricultural security area," as defined in section 3 of the "Agricultural Area Security Law."* * *"Commercial data center," a facility, campus of facilities or array of interconnected facilities located within this Commonwealth that:(1) is predominantly used to house and operate equipment that receives, stores, aggregates, manages, processes, transforms, retrieves, researches or transmits data; and(2) has a peak demand of 25 megawatts or greater.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding sections to read:Section 301.6. Comprehensive Plan Element for Commercial Data Centers.--If a municipality's comprehensive plan includes commercial data centers, the plan shall identify:(1) areas generally appropriate for the use of a data center, including where public infrastructure and utility capacity is available or planned; and(2) agricultural resources to be avoided, including prime agricultural land, agricultural security areas and land subject to agricultural conservation easements.20260HB2516PN3402 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 603.2. Zoning; Commercial Data Centers; Agricultural Land Protections.--(a) If a zoning ordinance authorizes commercial data centers in any zoning district, the zoning ordinance shall include standards that address:(1) setbacks and buffering from residential uses;(2) noise, lighting and landscaping mitigation;(3) documentation evidencing adequate water supply, sewage disposal and storm water management consistent with applicable law, including identification of the proposed source of water supply and any proposed groundwater withdrawal and, where the tract is in active agricultural use or adjoins land in active agricultural use, measures to avoid or mitigate adverse impacts to existing water supplies and private wells serving adjoining properties, including setback or separation requirements for proposed water withdrawal infrastructure;(4) emergency response planning; and(5) decommissioning, including standards for the removal of structures and equipment and restoration of the site after the commercial data center ceases operation.(b) A zoning ordinance may not permit and no governing body or zoning hearing board may approve, authorize or grant relief to allow a commercial data center on a tract, lot or parcel that is:(1) within an agricultural security area; or(2) subject to an agricultural conservation easement.(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit a municipality from adopting more restrictive standards, including overlay zoning districts or additional setbacks, consistent with this act and other applicable law.20260HB2516PN3402 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 603.3. Zoning; Commercial Data Centers; Approval Procedure and Minimum Standards.--(a) A commercial data center shall not be permitted in a municipality unless the zoning ordinance expressly authorizes the use in a zoning district and includes standards consistent with section 603.2 and this section. A municipality may authorize a commercial data center as a conditional use or special exception under section 603(c). Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a municipality to permit, provide for or authorize a commercial data center in any zoning district.(b) Unless a municipality adopts a more restrictive requirement, the zoning ordinance shall require:(1) a setback of not less than 2,500 feet between any principal building of a commercial data center and the nearest boundary line of any parcel containing a dwelling or zoned for residential use;(2) a setback of not less than 300 feet from any public road right-of-way;(3) maximum height limits for principal buildings and accessory structures;(4) landscaping and screening to mitigate visual, lighting and noise impacts, which may include evergreen plantings, berms, fencing, walls or other durable screening materials; and(5) any other objective buffering, screening or height requirements established by the municipality.(c) In addition to the notice required under section 908 for an application for conditional use or special exception approval of a commercial data center, the municipality shall ensure the following:20260HB2516PN3402 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The applicant submits to the municipality, and the municipality makes available for public inspection, a plain-language project summary, including:(i) the location and parcel identification of the proposed site;(ii) a general description of the proposed development and phases, if any;(iii) the anticipated peak demand stated in megawatts and the anticipated source or sources of electric supply;(iv) the anticipated maximum daily water withdrawal, diversion or consumptive use, if any, and the source or sources of water supply;(v) proposed measures for buffering, lighting and noise mitigation;(vi) any site plan, utility plan or other materials required by the zoning ordinance to demonstrate compliance with applicable setback, buffering, lighting, noise, water, sewage, storm water and emergency response standards; and(vii) a statement indicating whether a Pennsylvania Natural Diversity Inventory environmental review has been initiated or completed for the proposed project area and, if completed, a copy of the current Pennsylvania Natural Diversity Inventory Project environmental review receipt.(2) Written notice of the hearing is mailed to owners of real property located within one mile of the boundaries of the tract using addresses shown on county assessment rolls. The municipality may require the applicant to supply the mailing list and evidence of mailing.20260HB2516PN3402 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) A conspicuous notice is posted on the affected tract not less than 30 days prior to the first hearing and maintained through the date of the first hearing.(d) In granting an approval under subsection (a), the municipality:(1) shall make findings that the application complies with the zoning ordinance, section 603.2 and this section; and(2) may impose reasonable conditions and safeguards authorized under section 603(c) to mitigate impacts.(e) Following the public hearing required under section 609, a municipality may prohibit commercial data centers in all zoning districts if the governing body finds that the use would be inconsistent with the municipality's statement of community development objectives or would adversely affect public infrastructure, emergency management services, natural resources or the public's health, safety or general welfare.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2516PN3402 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718